Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202018-3409
Exemption from taxation.

The real property of a land bank and the land bank's income and operations are exempt from all taxation by the state or any political subdivision thereof.

Laws 2013, LB97, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,2018, § 19-5209;

Laws 2020, LB424, § 9.